North Carolina, session 2025, SB973.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

DOA QUARTERLY ACTION REPORT
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 143-341.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-341.2. Proactive management of State-owned and State-leased real property
portfolio.
(a) Duties of the Department of Administration. – The Department of Administration
shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) Development of comprehensive State facilities plan. – No later than April 1,
2023, and every five years thereafter, the Department of Administration shall
develop and implement a plan to comprehensively manage, acquire, and
dispose of the facilities and spaces required to fully support State government
operations. The plan shall do all of the following:
a. Identify the type, quantity, and location of facilities and spaces
required to fully support State government operations.
b. Include an in-depth analysis of existing State-owned facilities'
locations, capability, utilization, and condition.
c. Establish strategic priorities and objectives that allow the Department
of Administration to manage the performance of the State's portfolio
of real property in a way that maximizes the utilization of State-owned
facilities and minimizes operating and maintenance costs.
d. Take into consideration the information provided to the Department in
five-year real property management plans submitted by State agencies
pursuant to subdivision (b)(4) of this section.
e. Provide a mechanism for allocating available facilities or space to
State agencies that need it in a manner that reduces the need to acquire
new space through purchase, lease, or other means.
f. Provide recommendations for disposing of existing State property and
facilities, consolidating operations among existing facilities, and
relocating State agencies from leased facilities to State-owned
facilities.
g. Describe all changes made to space planning standards developed and
distributed as provided in subdivision (4) of this subsection.
*S973-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
(d) During the pendency and execution of the Department's comprehensive State
facilities plan described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the Department shall identify
facilities that are abandoned, condemned, flagged for surplus, or that otherwise require
extraordinary maintenance, including any Departmental recommendations, and shall compile and
submit a quarterly report to the Fiscal Research Division, the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Capital Improvements, and the Council of State."
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Administration the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to establish a reporting mechanism to cover the statewide inventory of
property being assessed under this section.
SECTION 1.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law. The initial quarterly
report required under this section shall be submitted on or before October 1, 2026.

SURPLUS PROPERTY VALUE ALIGNMENT
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 20-28.2(i) reads as rewritten:
"(i) Expedited Sale of Seized Motor Vehicles in Certain Cases. – In order to avoid
additional liability for towing and storage costs pending resolution of the criminal proceedings
of the defendant, the State Surplus Property Agency or county board of education may, after
expiration of 90 days from the date of seizure, sell any motor vehicle having a fair market value
of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) or less. The State Surplus Property Agency or
county board of education may also sell a motor vehicle, regardless of the fair market value, any
time the outstanding towing and storage costs exceed eighty-five percent (85%) of the fair market
value of the vehicle, or with the consent of all the motor vehicle owners. Any sale conducted
pursuant to this subsection shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of
G.S. 20-28.5(a) or G.S. 20-28.5(a1), as applicable, and the proceeds of the sale, after the payment
of outstanding towing and storage costs or reimbursement of towing and storage costs paid by a
person other than the defendant, shall be deposited with the clerk of superior court. If an order of
forfeiture is entered by the court, the court shall order the proceeds held by the clerk to be
disbursed as provided in G.S. 20-28.5(b). If the court determines that the motor vehicle is not
subject to forfeiture, the court shall order the proceeds held by the clerk to be disbursed first to
pay the sale, towing, and storage costs, second to pay outstanding liens on the motor vehicle, and
the balance to be paid to the motor vehicle owners."
SECTION 2.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law.

E-SIGNATURES ON PROPERTY TRANSACTIONS
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 143-341(4) reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-341. Powers and duties of Department.
The Department of Administration has the following powers and duties:
…
(4) Real Property Control:
…
c. To obtain and deposit with the Secretary of State the originals of all
deeds and other conveyances of real property to the State or to any
State agency, copies of all leases wherein the State or any State agency
is lessor or lessee, and certified copies of wills, judgments, and other
instruments whereby the State or any State agency has acquired title
to real property. Where an original of a deed, lease, or other instrument
cannot be found, but has been recorded in the registry of office of the
clerk of superior court of any county, a certified copy of such deed,
Page 2 Senate Bill 973-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
conveyance, or instrument shall be obtained and deposited with the
Secretary of State.
d. To acquire, whether by purchase, exercise of the power of eminent
domain, lease, or rental, all land, buildings, and space in buildings for
all State agencies, subject to the approval of the Governor and Council
of State in each instance. The Governor, acting with the approval of
the Council of State, may adopt rules (i) exempting from any or all of
the requirements of this paragraph such classes of lease, rental,
easement, and right-of-way transactions as he deems advisable; and
(ii) authorizing any State agency to enter into and/or approve the
classes of transactions thus exempted from the requirements of this
paragraph; and (iii) delegating to any other State agency the authority
to approve the severance of buildings and standing timber from State
lands; upon such approval of severance, the buildings and timber so
affected shall be treated, for the purposes of this Chapter, as personal
property. Any contract entered into or any proceeding instituted
contrary to the provisions of this paragraph is voidable in the discretion
of the Governor and Council of State.
d1. To require all State departments, institutions, and agencies to use
State-owned office space instead of negotiating or renegotiating leases
for rental of office space. In investigating the availability of office
space already owned by the State or by a State agency which might
meet the requirements of the requesting agency, the Department of
Administration shall review the utilization information maintained in
the real property database pursuant to this subdivision. Any lease
entered into contrary to the provisions of this paragraph is voidable in
the discretion of the Governor and the Council of State.
The Department of Administration shall report to the Joint
Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and to the
Fiscal Research Division no later than May 1 of each year on leased
office space.
d2. To purchase or finance the purchase of buildings, utilities, structures,
or other facilities or property developments, including streets and
landscaping, the acquisition of land, equipment, machinery, and
furnishings in connection therewith; additions, extensions,
enlargements, renovations, and improvements to existing buildings,
utilities, structures, or other facilities or property developments,
including streets and landscaping; land or any interest in land; other
infrastructure; furniture, fixtures, equipment, vehicles, machinery, and
similar items; or any combination of the foregoing, through
installment-purchase, lease-purchase, or other similar type installment
financing agreements in the manner and to the extent provided in
Article 9 of Chapter 142 of the General Statutes. Any contract entered
into or any proceeding instituted contrary to the provisions of this
paragraph is voidable in the discretion of the Council of State.
e. To make all sales of real property (including marshlands or
swamplands) owned by the State or by any State agency, with the
approval of the Governor and Council of State in each instance. All
conveyances in fee by the State shall be executed in accordance with
the provisions of G.S. 146-74 through 146-78. Any conveyance of
land made or contract to convey land entered into without the approval
Senate Bill 973-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of the Governor and Council of State is voidable in the discretion of
the Governor and Council of State. The proceeds of all sales of
swamplands or marshlands shall be dealt with in the manner required
by the Constitution and statutes.
f. With the approval of the Governor and Council of State, to make all
leases and rentals of land or buildings owned by the State or by any
State agency, and to sublease land or buildings leased by the State or
by any State agency from another owner, where such land or building
owned or leased by the State or by any State agency is not needed for
current use. The Governor, acting with the approval of the Council of
State, may adopt rules (i) exempting from any or all of the
requirements of this paragraph such classes of lease or rental
transactions as he deems advisable; and (ii) authorizing any State
agency to enter into and/or approve the classes of transactions thus
exempted from the requirements of this paragraph; and (iii) delegating
to any other State agency the authority to approve the severance of
buildings and standing timber from State lands; upon such approval of
severance, the buildings and timber so affected shall be treated, for the
purposes of this Chapter, as personal property. Any lease or rental
agreement entered into contrary to the provisions of this paragraph is
voidable in the discretion of the Governor and Council of State.
f1. To the extent practicable, to execute any documents, instruments, or
other records necessary in accordance with the provisions of Article
40 of Chapter 66 of the General Statutes in connection with any
purchase, sale, or lease of property.
…."
SECTION 3.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
property transactions entered into on or after that date.

STATE PROPERTY NOTICES
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 146-25.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 146-25.1. Proposals to be secured for leases.
(a) If pursuant to G.S. 146-25, the Department of Administration determines that it is in
the best interest of the State to lease or rent land and the rental is estimated to exceed forty
thousand dollars ($40,000) per year or the term will exceed three years, the Department shall
require the State agency desiring to rent land to prepare and submit for its approval a set of
specifications for its needs. Upon approval of specifications, the Department shall prepare a
public advertisement. The State agency shall (i) may place such the public advertisement in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county for proposals from prospective lessors of said land
or (ii) may advertise through other electronic means and shall make such other distribution
thereof as the Department directs. The advertisement shall be run or posted for at least five
consecutive days, and shall provide that proposals shall be received for at least seven days from
the date of the last advertisement in the State Property Office of the Department. The provisions
of this section do not apply to property owned by governmental agencies and leased to other
governmental agencies. For the purposes of this section, "electronic means" includes posting the
advertisement on the Department's website or any other means deemed appropriate by the
Department to provide adequate notice.
…."
SECTION 4.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
advertisements run or posted on or after that date.

Page 4 Senate Bill 973-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 973-First Edition Page 5